src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-akkiji_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../generator-gt-norm.hfstol
    Morph: ../../analyser-gt-norm.hfstol
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - akkiji: # Noun 187 'eng /est püüdja/fin' - full paradigm
     akkiji+N+Sg+Nom: akkiji
     akkiji+N+Sg+Gen: akkijiz
     akkiji+N+Sg+Par: akkijizt
     akkiji+N+Sg+Dat: akkijizõn
     akkiji+N+Sg+Ins: akkijizõks
     akkiji+N+Sg+Ill: akkijizõ
     akkiji+N+Sg+Ela: akkijizõst
     akkiji+N+Pl+Nom: akkijid
     akkiji+N+Pl+Gen: akkijid
     akkiji+N+Pl+Par: akkijidi
     akkiji+N+Pl+Dat: akkijidõn
     akkiji+N+Pl+Ins: akkijidõks
     akkiji+N+Pl+Ill: akkijiž
     akkiji+N+Pl+Ela: akkijisti
